California statutes. Water Code
The hydroelectric plant and transmission lines constructed pursuant to this chapter may be leased for operation to, or the power generated may be sold to, a public utility or public agency engaged in the distribution, use, or sale of electricity.

The power generated may be used by the district for its own purposes, or for the production or transmission of water, but shall not be offered for sale directly by the district to customers, other than a public utility or public agency, for any use other than the production or transmission of water.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1054, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35573.

The powers granted by this chapter shall not include, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit, the acquisition of property or facilities already employed in the generation of hydroelectric energy, except by mutual agreement with the owner and operator of the property or facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1054, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Property [35600. - 35628.]



  ARTICLE 1. Acquisition and Disposition of Property [35600. - 35604.]

35600.

A district may, within or without the district in the State, acquire by purchase, condemnation, or other legal means all property or rights in property necessary or proper for the district works and to supply the land with sufficient water for all district purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

35601.

The right is hereby granted to locate, construct, and maintain works of a district on any land owned by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35602.

There is given, dedicated, and set apart for the uses and purposes of each district all water and water rights belonging to the State within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35603.

A district may construct any works along, under, or across any stream of water, watercourse, street, avenue, highway, railway, canal, ditch, or flume which the route of a pipeline or canal of the works may proceed along or across in a manner that will afford security for life and property. The district shall restore the property crossed as near as may be to its former state or so as not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness. Every company whose railroad is crossed by the works shall unite with the district in forming the crossing and shall grant the necessary privileges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1552, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35604.

A district may for a valuable consideration lease, sell, or contract for the sale of any property of the district whenever it may be necessary, advisable, or for the best interests of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eminent Domain [35627. - 35628.]

35627.

If the district and the owners and controllers of any property or franchise to be crossed by works of a district cannot agree with the district as to payment, location, or the manner of the crossing, these matters shall be determined as in a proceeding in eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35628.

A district shall not exercise the right of eminent domain under this article for the condemnation of property outside the boundaries of the principal county in which the district is situated unless it first obtains the consent thereto of the board of supervisors of the county in which such property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Public Liability [35752. - 35752.]

35752.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Contracts With Other Agencies [35850. - 35855.]

35850.

A district may for a valuable consideration enter into any contract with any irrigation or drainage district formed under the laws of the State as the board deems proper or advisable in the interests of the district, or to carry out or execute any of the purposes authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35850.5.

A district shall have power to join with one or more public agencies, private corporations or other persons for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of such district, and for that purpose to contract with such other public agencies or private corporations or persons for the purpose of financing such acquisitions, constructions and operations. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this division, such contracts may provide that bonds of such district may be issued in order to acquire water rights or entitlements, including the right to receive and use water or a water supply, for each of the parties to such contracts, with such water rights or entitlements being divided among the parties in consideration of the payments to be made by such parties in order to provide debt service on the bonds of such district. A district may issue its bonds for the purpose of acquiring such water rights or entitlements under such contracts whenever joint action with the other parties to such contracts is reasonably necessary or convenient in order to obtain such water rights or entitlements for the district, and in such case the issuance of bonds of the district shall be considered a public purpose for the benefit of the district within the meaning of Section 25 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. Such contracts may provide for contributions to be made by each party thereto and for the division and apportionment of the expenses of such acquisitions and operations, and the division and apportionment of the benefits, the services and products therefrom, and may provide for an agency to effect such acquisitions and to carry on such operations, and shall provide in the powers and methods of procedure for such agency the method by which such agency may contract. Such contracts with other public or private corporations or persons may contain such other and further convenants and agreements as may be necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

35851.

A district may for a valuable consideration enter into any contract with the United States, the State, or any department or agency of either, or with any distribution district or improvement district formed within its boundaries, or with any political subdivision of the State, including irrigation and reclamation districts, as the board deems proper, advisable, or in the interest of the district for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) For the storage, regulation, control, development, and distribution of water for the irrigation of land.

(b) For the use, control, and distribution of drainage water within the district.

(c) For the construction, extension, operation, control, maintenance, and management of any works or other property constructed or acquired by the district, or over which it may have control, or which may be used or useful for the irrigation or drainage of land or for providing hydroelectric power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

35852.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this chapter may provide:

(a) That the land shall be included in any irrigation, drainage, or reclamation project operated directly or indirectly by or under the authority of the United States or the State.

(b) That the land shall receive water, electric power, drainage service, or other works or property of the irrigation, drainage, or reclamation project, including revenues derived therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35853.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this article may provide for the sale and conveyance to the United States, the State, any reclamation or irrigation project formed or operated by or under the authority of either, or any irrigation or water district formed under the laws of the State on any conditions agreed upon, which conditions shall require that the purchasing party furnish water to the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35855.

An action to determine the validity of any contract may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1529.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Cooperation With the United States [35875. - 35886.]

35875.

Districts may cooperate and contract with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

35876.

The cooperation and contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition, extension, or operation of works for irrigation or drainage or flood control.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States. 

(d) To receive or borrow money from the United States and provide for the repayment thereof, for the purpose of constructing projects, distribution systems or other works for the district or for any distribution district or improvement district formed therein, which said works shall be used for the storage, regulation, control, development and distribution of water for the irrigation of land or for the use, control and distribution of drainage water within the district or for flood control purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

35877.

Districts may carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

35878.

To carry out the preceding sections of this article a district has all powers, rights, and privileges possessed by irrigation districts and may exercise those powers, rights, and privileges in the same manner as irrigation districts as provided in the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

35879.

If any provision of the Irrigation District Federal Cooperation Law is held unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of the adoption by reference in this article of the remaining portions of that law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

35880.

In any contract made between a district and the United States pursuant to this chapter, the land which may be charged with any taxes or assessments under the contract shall be designated and described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

35881.

A proposal to enter into a contract with the United States for any purpose other than obtaining a water supply shall be authorized at an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

35882.

Proceedings at the election shall be had insofar as applicable in the manner provided in the case of issuance of general obligation bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

35883.

Notice of the election shall specify:

a. The time and place of the election.

b. The purpose of the election.

c. A brief statement of the general purpose of the contract.

d. The amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1935.)
-------------------------------------------

35884.

The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract. To the right of or below the statement on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 53.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35886.

The board may execute the contract on behalf of the district if two-thirds of the votes cast at the election favor the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 65.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS [35900. - 36458.1.]



  CHAPTER 1. Funds and Warrants [35900. - 35912.]

35900.

The treasurer shall receive to the credit of the district and in trust for its use and benefit all the money belonging to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35901.

All money belonging to the district, or to which the district is entitled, shall, when received, be paid by the person receiving it to the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35902.

The treasurer shall establish for the district a general obligation bond fund and a general fund and shall apportion the district money to the funds as follows:

(a) To the general obligation bond fund, that portion of the money received from the collection of assessments or from the sale of property for delinquent assessments which bears the same proportion to the total amount received from the collection of assessments or from the sale of property for delinquent assessments as that portion of the estimate of the board on which the assessment was based which is required for the payment of general obligation bonds and the interest thereon bears to the whole amount of the estimate.

(b) To the general fund, the balance of all money received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35903.

The money placed in the general obligation bond fund shall be used for the payment of bonds and of the interest thereon and until the total bonded indebtedness of the district is discharged shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35903.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 35903, any amount in the general obligation bond fund in excess of the amount needed to pay principal and interest on bonds during the then current fiscal year and the succeeding fiscal year may be transferred by the treasurer to the general fund.

(b) This section shall apply only to the Fern Valley Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 269.)
-------------------------------------------

35904.

Any money belonging to a district may be deposited by the treasurer pursuant to the general laws governing the deposit of public money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35905.

Where the deposit of money is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation no additional security need be required from the bank for the portion of the district’s deposits so insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35906.

Except for the payment of bonds and the interest thereon district money shall not be paid out by the treasurer unless a warrant therefor has been drawn and executed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35907.

Warrants are contracts in writing for the payment of money and an action based on warrants payable on demand shall be commenced within four years from the date of their issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

35908.

In any proceeding for a writ of mandate to compel the board to issue a warrant, the court shall proceed as in other civil actions and shall cause a writ to issue for any sum found to be due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35909.

The board of directors may provide for a bond reserve fund for the purpose of payment of the principal of or interest on bonds of the district as the same shall become due. Except as otherwise provided in the resolution providing for the issuance of said bonds and so long as any of said bonds are outstanding, any moneys set aside in said bond reserve fund shall be used solely to pay the principal of or interest on said bonds as the same shall become due, in the event and to the extent that other available moneys of the district are insufficient therefor. When all of the principal of or interest on said bonds has been paid, the balance of the money remaining in the bond reserve fund shall be transferred to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

35910.

All or any portion of a bond reserve fund may be established out of the proceeds of the sale of said bonds. In such case the estimate referred to in Section 35950 shall include or make provision for such bond reserve fund and the ballot cast at the bond election shall contain a statement to the effect that all or part of said bond reserve fund is to be established from the proceeds of said bonds. Upon the delivery of and payment for said bonds, the portion of the proceeds provided for said bond reserve fund shall be set aside therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

35911.

The resolution providing for the issuance of bonds may provide for a bond reserve fund to be established, in whole or in part, from water charges or annual assessments, or both. In such event said water charges or annual assessments, in addition to the other amounts required or authorized to be included therein, shall include such amount or amounts as shall be provided by said resolution for said bond reserve fund, and upon collection thereof said amount or amounts shall be set aside in said bond reserve fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

35912.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Irvine Ranch Water District may invest or reinvest its capital facilities replacement funds in real estate and interests therein and improvements thereon, located within the County of Orange, as an investment for the production of income. The total aggregate amount of those investments shall not exceed 30 percent of the district’s total capital facilities replacement funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Provisions Relating to All Bonds [35950. - 36064.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bond Issuance [35950. - 35954.]

35950.

The board shall, as soon after the formation of the district as is practicable, prepare and adopt a plan of works and estimate the amount of money it is necessary to raise for the purposes for which bonds may be issued. Such plan shall be adopted in the manner hereinafter provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 4.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.1.

After the board has adopted a plan of works it may thereafter by resolution change or supplement the plan if it determines that the works described in the plan as changed or supplemented will benefit all the territory within the district or improvement district, including any territory annexed thereto since the adoption of the original plan of works, and may revise its estimate of the amount of money it is necessary to raise for that purpose. Any such changes or supplements shall be accomplished in the manner hereinafter provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.2.

If the board determines to adopt a plan of works, or that it is necessary to change or supplement a plan of works previously adopted for a district or an improvement district, it shall adopt a resolution stating the following:

(a) The intention of the board to adopt a plan of works, or to change or supplement a previously adopted plan of works.

(b) A description of the purpose of the plan, or of the original purpose of the plan and a general description of the proposed change or supplement.

(c) The estimated expense of carrying out the plan of works, or any change in the estimated expense of carrying out the plan of works by reason of the change or supplement.

(d) If general obligation bonds are to be issued and sold for the purpose of providing funds to carry out the plan of works or the change or supplement of a plan of works previously adopted, that assessments for carrying out said purpose shall be levied exclusively on the lands of the district or improvement district including any territory annexed thereto.

(e) If revenue bonds are to be issued and sold for the purpose of providing funds to carry out the plan of works or change or supplement of a plan of works previously adopted, that only the revenues derived from the operation of such works shall be pledged to the payment of principal and interest on such bonds and that no tax or assessment shall ever be levied or collected to pay principal or interest on such bonds.

(f) That a map of the exterior boundaries of the district or an improvement district is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(g) The time and place of the hearing by the board in regard to the proposed plan, or to the proposed change or supplement, and the benefit or lack thereof to the lands within the district or an improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 5.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.3.

Notice of said hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution provided for in Section 35950.2 in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code; the first publication to be at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. Said notice shall also be given by posting a copy of said resolution in three public places within the district or the improvement district for at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for said hearing. No notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.4.

At the time and place so fixed or at any time or place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided for by the resolution at which hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the district or improvement district to which the hearing pertains, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution or any matters material thereto. At the conclusion of the hearing on the proposed plan, or the proposed changes or supplements, the board may, by resolution, adopt the proposed plan of works, or amend the plan of works previously adopted in accordance with the proposed changes or supplements. The board shall set forth the estimated cost of carrying out any plan of works and the purpose to be accomplished. If there is any change in the estimate of cost of carrying out the plan of works and the purpose is to be accomplished, the amended total of the estimated expense shall be set forth specifically.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.5.

If the issuance of bonds has been authorized previously by the district or by the district for an improvement district and the change or supplement to the plan of works has increased the original estimate of cost, the board may provide for and call a special bond election within the district or the improvement district to submit to the voters of the district or the improvement district a proposition of whether or not additional indebtedness shall be incurred and bonds issued therefor in an amount which, when added to the amount of unissued bonds previously authorized to accomplish the original plan of works, will not exceed the revised estimate of cost set forth in the resolution approving the change or supplement to the plan of works. Said proposition need only refer to the amended plan, state the amount of additional bonds to be authorized, and indicate that previously authorized bonds will be issued to carry out the amended plan. Said proposition need not state the amount of unissued bonds previously authorized. In any such instance, the special bond election provided for herein shall be called, noticed, held, conducted and the results thereof canvassed in substantially the same manner as provided for in this division for bond elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 6.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35950.7.

Any bonds authorized to accomplish the amended plan of the district or improvement district shall be issued and sold in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as general obligation bonds of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 8.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35951.

Bonds may be issued for the purposes of acquiring or constructing works for irrigation, domestic, municipal, and industrial water supply, acquiring the necessary property for these works, acquiring funds to fulfill contractual commitments to carry out the powers and purposes of the district contained in contracts with other agencies, including contractual commitments entered into pursuant to Section 35850.5, acquiring all or part of the operating funds for the district (the total amount of such funds so acquired not to exceed at any time an amount equal to the total operating costs of the district for a two-year period as estimated by its board), acquiring any property necessary for the purposes of the district, redeeming any outstanding warrants of the district issued for the acquisition or construction of works of the district and otherwise carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

35953.

When the treasurer receives the bonds from the board, he shall place them to the credit of the district and keep a record of the bonds, the payment thereof, and the interest thereon, in a book provided for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35954.

A district may, when necessary or proper, issue additional bonds in the same manner as provided for the original issue for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To complete works.

(b) To acquire property or property rights necessary or proper to complete the works.

(c) To supply the land with sufficient water for irrigation, domestic, industrial, and municipal purposes.

(d) To make additions to the works.

(e) To refund any issue of bonds previously made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lien of Bonds [35975. - 35975.]

35975.

Unless otherwise provided in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds, they and the interest on them shall be paid from an annual assessment upon land or charges which in the discretion of the board are fixed and collected in lieu thereof and all land shall be and remain liable to the assessed for these payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale and Exchange of Bonds [35995. - 35998.1.]

35995.

The board shall provide ways and means for the sale of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35996.

(a) The bonds, or any part thereof, may be issued and sold as the board determines. 

(b) Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board may give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale. 

(c) In the alternative, the board may, if it determines that to do so would produce a lower interest cost on the bonds, sell bonds at a private sale without first advertising for bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

35997.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 36170, a district shall not sell or exchange any of its bonds for less than par value plus the accrued interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35998.

When any bonds are sold by the district, the treasurer shall deliver the bonds purchased to the purchaser upon receiving the purchase price of said bonds plus the accrued interest on said bonds and the premium, if any, bid by the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35998.1.

The accrued interest and premium, if any, shall be placed in the general obligation bond fund. The purchase price of said bonds shall be placed in the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes for which said bonds were voted. When said purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining in said improvement fund shall be transferred to the general obligation bond fund and when all principal of and interest on said bonds has been paid, the balance of money then remaining in the general obligation bond fund shall be transferred to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Validating Proceedings [36050. - 36050.]

36050.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Refunding Bonds [36060. - 36064.]

36060.

This article applies only to the Irvine Ranch, Moulton-Niguel, Rancho California, and Santa Margarita Water Districts. “District” as used in this article means the Irvine Ranch Water District, the Moulton-Niguel Water District, the Rancho California Water District, or the Santa Margarita Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

36061.

A district may, when necessary or proper, issue additional bonds in the same manner as provided for the original issue for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To accomplish one or more of the purposes specified in Section 35954.

(b) To refund any issue of bonds previously made. Refunding bonds may be issued pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 53550) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, without submitting the question of issuance of the refunding bonds to a vote of the qualified electors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

36062.

A district may bring an action pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to validate the issuance of any or all of the remaining bonds which were authorized by the voters at any given election, if the district’s board of directors has adopted a resolution authorizing the issuance of the remaining bonds of the authorization, inclusive of any refunding bonds that might be issued therefor under Section 36063, in such series and at such times as the board may, in its discretion, determine, and at the interest rates as may be authorized by law at the time of issuance, including, but not limited to, Article 8 (commencing with Section 53540) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The terms of a judgment obtained in a proceeding hereunder may include a ruling that the validation shall automatically incorporate any change made in the interest rate set forth in Article 8 (commencing with Section 53540) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code by a later-enacted statute. Any action commenced under this section may be filed either in a superior court or in a district court of appeals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

36063.

(a) Whenever the board of directors determines that prudent management of the fiscal affairs of the district so requires, it may refund by defeasing or calling for redemption any outstanding bonds, subject to all of the following: 

(1) The last-maturing refunding bonds shall mature not later than the date on which the last-maturing bonds being refunded would have matured.

(2) Refunding bonds shall not be issued unless the total interest cost to maturity of the refunding bonds added to the principal amount of those refunding bonds will be less than the total interest cost to maturity of the bonds being refunded added to the principal amount of the bonds being refunded. If any of the refunding bonds or the bonds being refunded, or both, bear or may bear interest at a variable rate, thereby making the actual total interest cost to maturity indeterminable in advance of maturity, the determination required by this paragraph may consist of a finding made by the board based on substantial evidence, which means evidence that is reasonable, credible, and of solid value and ponderable legal significance, based upon the record as a whole. The test in Section 53552 of the Government Code need not be met if the determination in this paragraph is made.

(3) The savings achieved through the refunding of bonds shall be used by the board of directors solely to reduce the assessments or charges, or both, which are fixed and collected for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the refunding bonds. The reductions to reflect the savings in any fiscal year shall be made not later than the next succeeding fiscal year.

(b) The refunding bonds shall be issued according to Article 9 (commencing with Section 53550) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(c) When the originally issued bonds have been refunded, the refunding bonds shall thereafter take the place of, and be deemed for all purposes to be, the bonds corresponding to the portion of the authorization by the voters from which the refunded bonds were originally issued and shall be payable from the same funds as those refunded bonds. Following the refunding, the same portion of the corresponding voter authorization as was previously canceled by issuance of the refunded bonds shall remain canceled and shall be deemed to be the amount of indebtedness issued from the voter authorization representing the refunding bonds. However, refunding bonds issued under this section shall be used only for the purpose of reducing debt service costs on bonds issued from indebtedness approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978, or refunding bonds issued in place thereof under this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 53569 of the Government Code and Section 35996 of this code, if the board of directors determines that to do so would be consistent with prudent management of the district’s fiscal affairs, the board may sell refunding bonds issued under this section at private sale without advertising for bids.

(e) The disbursement of the proceeds of the refunding bonds, pursuant to this section, shall be at the direction of the board of directors or the district’s authorized officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective September 17, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36063.5.

(a) The following terms shall have the following meanings for purposes of this section:

(1) “Bond counsel” means any attorney or firm of attorneys that represents the issuer of a new issue of bonds with respect to the issuance of the bonds and that renders a written legal opinion to, or as counsel for, the issuer with respect to the validity of the bonds.

(2) “Bond” means any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by a district, or certificates of participation in any lease, sale, or other obligations of a district. “New issue of bonds” means the original issuance of bonds by a district to one or more purchasers until, in the case of underwriters, the end of the underwriting period. In the case of bonds with a tender or put option feature, or commercial paper, “new issue of bonds” means only the original issuance and not any remarketing, rollover, or reissuance.

(3) A “financial advisory relationship” exists when an investment firm, or other person or firm in the business of providing financial advisory or financial consulting services to issuers with respect to municipal securities, renders, or enters into an agreement to render, financial advisory or financial consultant services to, or on behalf of, an issuer with respect to a new issue or issues of bonds, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms, and other similar matters concerning the issue or issues, for a fee or other compensation or in expectation of such compensation for the rendering of those services. However, a financial advisory relationship does not exist when, in the course of acting as an underwriter, an investment firm renders advice to an issuer, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms, and other similar matters concerning a new issue of bonds or when, for any new issue of bonds, an investment firm advises and assists an issuer with respect to obtaining consent from holders of previously issued bonds in connection with, among other things, amendments of covenants or defaults.

(4) “Investment firm” means any bank, investment bank, partnership, corporation, association, or other firm engaged in the business of buying and selling bonds for its own account or for the account of others as part of its regular business.
